Utah statutes.
78A-6-605.   Dispositional report required in minor’s cases -- Exceptions.
(1)  The probation department or other agency designated by the court shall
make a dispositional report in writing in all minor's cases in which a
petition has been filed, except that the court may dispense with the study and
report in cases involving violations of traffic laws or ordinances, violations
of wildlife laws, boating laws, and other minor cases.
(2)  When preparing a dispositional report and recommendation in a delinquency
action, the probation department or other agency designated by the court shall
consider the juvenile sentencing guidelines developed in accordance with
Section 63M-7-404 and any aggravating or mitigating circumstances.
(3)  Where the allegations of a petition filed under Subsection 78A-6-103(1)
are denied, the investigation may not be made until the court has made an
adjudication.
